Utah statutes.
31A-5-502.   Merger and consolidation of stock insurance corporations.

Any two or more stock insurance corporations may merge or consolidate, under the procedures set forth under Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act.  All mergers are subject to the provisions of Chapter 16.



Amended by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

